Utah statutes.
76-10-308.   Explosive, chemical, or incendiary device -- Venue of
prosecution for shipping.
Any person who knowingly, intentionally, or recklessly delivers any explosive,
chemical, or incendiary device to any person for transmission without the
consent or direction of the lawful possessor may be prosecuted in the county
in which he delivers it or in the county to which it is transmitted.
